src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!! !!!Numerals
!  --------
!! Numerals in Evenki denote numbers.

LEXICON NUM_BIRA
+Num: X_BIRA ;
+Num+Ord:%>ни{ː%} X_BIRA ;

LEXICON NUM_UMUK
+Num: X_UMUK ;
+Num+Ord:%>и{ː%} X_UMUK ;

LEXICON NUM_ORON
+Num: X_ORON ;
+Num+Ord:%>ни{ː%} X_ORON ;


LEXICON Numerals
Cardinals ;
!Ordinals ;
!Collective ;
Numeral_derivations ;

LEXICON Cardinals
умӯн:уму%{ː%} NUM_ORON ; ! "1 "
дю̄р:дю%{ː%}р NUM_UMUK ; ! "2 "
илан:ила NUM_ORON ; ! "3 "
дыгин:дыги NUM_ORON ; ! "4 "
тунӈа:тунӈа NUM_BIRA ; ! "5 "
нюӈун:нюӈу NUM_ORON ; ! "6 "
надан:нада NUM_ORON ; ! "7 "
дяпкун:дяпку NUM_ORON ; ! "8 "
егин:еги NUM_ORON ; ! "9 "
дя̄н:дя%{ː%} NUM_ORON ; ! "10 "

дю̄рдя̄р:дю%{ː%}рдя%{ː%}р NUM_UMUK ; ! "20 "
иландя̄р:иландя%{ː%}р NUM_UMUK ; ! "30 "
дыгиндя̄р:дыгиндя%{ː%}р NUM_UMUK ; ! "40 "
тунӈадя̄р:тунӈадя%{ː%}р NUM_UMUK ; ! "50 "

нямадӣ:нямади%{ː%} NUM_UMUK ; ! "100 "


LEXICON Numeral_derivations
numder_ones ;
numder_more ;

LEXICON numder_ones 
ум+Adv:умнэ%{ː%} # ;
ум+Adv:умутэл # ;

LEXICON numder_more 
дю̄р:дю%{ː%}  numdertypes ;
илан:ила 	  numdertypes ;
дыгин:дыги 	  numdertypes ;
тунӈа:тунӈа   numdertypes ;
нюӈун:нюӈу 	  numdertypes ;
надан:нада 	  numdertypes ;
дяпкун:дяпку  numdertypes ;
егин:еги 	  numdertypes ;
дя̄н:дя%{ː%}  numdertypes ;

LEXICON numdertypes
+Adv:%>гд%{A%} # ;
+Adv:%>р%{A%}%{ː%} # ;
+Adv:%>т%{A%}л # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
